Washington statutes.
RCW 4.12.025

Action to be brought where defendant resides—Optional venue of actions upon unlawful issuance of check or draft—Residence of corporations—Optional venue of actions against corporations.

(1) An action may be brought in any county in which the defendant resides, or, if there be more than one defendant, where some one of the defendants resides at the time of the commencement of the action. For the purpose of this section, the residence of a corporation defendant shall be deemed to be in any county where the corporation: (a) Transacts business; (b) has an office for the transaction of business; (c) transacted business at the time the cause of action arose; or (d) where any person resides upon whom process may be served upon the corporation.

(2) An action upon the unlawful issuance of a check or draft may be brought in any county in which the defendant resides or may be brought in any division of the judicial district in which the check was issued or presented as payment.

(3) The venue of any action brought against a corporation, at the option of the plaintiff, shall be: (a) In the county where the tort was committed; (b) in the county where the work was performed for said corporation; (c) in the county where the agreement entered into with the corporation was made; or (d) in the county where the corporation has its residence.

[ 1998 c 56 s 1; 1985 c 68 s 2; 1983 c 31 s 1; 1965 c 53 s 168; 1927 c 173 s 1; RRS s 205-1. Prior: 1909 c 42 s 1; Code 1881 s 49; 1877 p 11 s 50; 1869 p 13 s 50; 1860 p 101 s 488; 1854 p 220 s 494.]